Vermont, session 2025-2026, H6.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 19, Sec. 5 is amended to read:
Sec. 5. [Deleted.]
Sec. 2. 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 19, Sec. 6 is amended to read:
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATES
* * *
VT LEG #378719 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.6
2025 Page 2 of 2
(b) Sec. 5 (marriage licenses; 32 V.S.A. § 1712) shall take effect on July 1,
2025. [Deleted.]
* * *
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #378719 v.1